Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 2-121, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 81, O.S.L. 2022 (37A O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 2-121), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-121. A. An employee license shall authorize the
holder thereof to work in a licensed package store, retail spirits,
retail wine or retail beer establishment, brewpub, mixed beverage
establishment, beer and wine establishment, bottle club, public
event or any establishment where alcohol or alcoholic beverages are
sold, mixed or served. Persons employed by a mixed beverage, on-
premises beer and wine, retail wine, retail beer, public event or a
bottle club licensee who do not participate in the service, mixing
or sale of mixed beverages shall not be required to have an employee
license. Provided, however, that a manager employed by a mixed
beverage licensee, public event licensee or a bottle club shall be
required to have an employee license whether or not the manager
participates in the service, mixing or sale of mixed beverages.
Applicants for an employee license shall be at least eighteen (18)
years of age, except for applicants employed by a grocery store or
convenience store who shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age,
and have a health card issued by the county in which they are

employed, if the county issues such a card; provided. Provided, the
provisions of this section shall not be construed to permit any
person under twenty-one (21) years of age to be employed to sell
spirits; however, individuals eighteen (18) years of age and older
may open and serve beer and wine from their original containers or
serve beer, wine, and spirits from a shaker tin that has been
premade and mixed by an employee who is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age. Employees of a special event, caterer, unless
catering a mixed beverage-licensed premises, or airline/railroad
beverage licensees shall not be required to obtain an employee
license; further, employees of beer distributors and other licensees
holding licenses issued by the ABLE Commission shall not be required
to obtain an employee license if such employee only sells alcohol or
alcoholic beverages to establishments holding licenses issued by the
ABLE Commission and not to the public. Persons employed by a hotel
licensee who participate in the stocking of hotel room mini-bars or
in the handling of alcoholic beverages to be placed in such devices
shall be required to have an employee license. As a prerequisite to
the issuance of an employee license, not later than fourteen (14)
days after initial licensure, the first-time applicant shall be
required to have successfully completed a training program conducted
by the ABLE Commission, or by another entity approved by the ABLE
Commission including an in-house training program conducted by the
employer. Proof of training completion shall be made available for
inspection by the ABLE Commission at the business location employing
the licensee. The failure of an employee licensee to comply with
this section may constitute a revocable offense.
B. In the event the ABLE Commission denies an application for
an employee license, the Commission shall provide written notice to
the applicant's employer, if any. The notice shall be given at the
time notice is provided to the applicant.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1062 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1062 Page 3